Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.240

Internet payment option.

(1) The department shall provide on its internet payment option website:

(a) That a filing fee will be collected on all transactions subject to a filing fee;

(b) That a subagent service fee will be collected by a subagent office for mail or pickup licensing services; and

(c) The amount of the filing and subagent service fees.

(2) The filing and subagent service fees must be shown below each office listed.

[ 2010 c 161 s 206.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.